test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tohtosapoy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - tohtôsâpoy - ok : # -m inanimate noun, milk, with poss. element
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg: tohtôsâpoy
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl: tohtôsâpoya
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Loc: tohtôsâpôhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: tohcôsâposis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: tohcôsâposisak
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: tohcôsâposisihk
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôhtôsâpom
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôhtôsâpom
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôhtôsâpom
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: otôhtôsâpomiyiw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôhtôsâpominân
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôhtôsâpominaw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôhtôsâpomiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otôhtôsâpomiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: otôhtôsâpomiyiw
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôhtôsâpoma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôhtôsâpoma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôhtôsâpoma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: otôhtôsâpomiyiwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôhtôsâpominâna
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôhtôsâpominawa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôhtôsâpomiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôhtôsâpomiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: otôhtôsâpomiyiwa
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicohcôsâpomis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicohcôsâpomis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocohcôsâpomis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: ocohcôsâpomisiyiw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicohcôsâpomisinân
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicohcôsâpomisinaw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicohcôsâpomisiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ocohcôsâpomisiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: ocohcôsâpomisiyiw
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicohcôsâpomisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicohcôsâpomisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ocohcôsâpomisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: ocohcôsâpomisiyiwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicohcôsâpomisinâna
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicohcôsâpomisinawa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicohcôsâpomisiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ocohcôsâpomisiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: ocohcôsâpomisiyiwa
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôhtôsâpomihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôhtôsâpomihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôhtôsâpomihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: otôhtôsâpomiyihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôhtôsâpominâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôhtôsâpominâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôhtôsâpomiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôhtôsâpomiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: otôhtôsâpomiyihk

     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicohcôsâpomisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicohcôsâpomisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocohcôsâpomisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: ocohcôsâpomisiyihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicohcôsâpomisinâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicohcôsâpomisinâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicohcôsâpomisiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocohcôsâpomisiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: ocohcôsâpomisiyihk
